Hindi/hi-nouns.aff
FLAG num

# hi-noun8 eg. आत्मा/13
SFX 13 Y 2
SFX 13 0 एँ ा
SFX 13 0 ओँ ा

# hi-noun8a eg. गुड़िया/22
SFX 22 Y 2
SFX 22 0 ँ ा
SFX 22 0 ओँ ा

# hi-noun8b eg. अँगरखा/12
SFX 12 Y 2
SFX 12 ा े ा
SFX 12 ा ोँ ा

# hi-noun8c eg. चाचा/14
SFX 14 Y 1
SFX 14 0 ओँ ा

# hi-noun6 eg. अटकल/15
SFX 15 Y 2
SFX 15 0 ेँ .
SFX 15 0 ोँ .

# hi-noun5 eg. अंग/16, अँगरेज/16
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 ोँ .

# hi-noun4 eg. कली/17
SFX 17 Y 2
SFX 17 ी ियाँ ी
SFX 17 ी िओँ ी

# hi-noun4a eg. भाई/18, धोबी/18
SFX 18 Y 3
SFX 18 ी िओँ ी
SFX 18 ई इओँ ई
SFX 18 ई इयाँ ई

# hi-noun3 eg. जाति/19
SFX 19 Y 2
SFX 19 ि ियाँ ि
SFX 19 ि िओँ ि

# hi-noun3a eg. मुनि/20
SFX 20 Y 1
SFX 20 ि िओँ ि

# hi-noun2 eg. बहू/21, वस्तु/21, गौ/21
SFX 21 Y 3
SFX 21 ू ुओँ ू
SFX 21 ु ुओँ ु
SFX 21 0 ओँ ौ

# hi-noun8a eg. गुड़िया/22
# hi-noun1
